Wyoming, session 2025, HB0096.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-4-140 is created to read:

35-4-140. Discrimination based on face coverings,
vaccination status and medical testing; penalty.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0096

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0239
(i) "COVID-19" means the novel coronavirus
identified as severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus
(SARS-CoV-2), any disease caused by severe acute
respiratory syndrome coronavirus (SARS-CoV-2), its viral
fragments or a virus mutating therefrom and all conditions
associated with the disease that are caused by severe acute
respiratory syndrome coronavirus (SARS-CoV-2), its viral
fragments or a virus mutating therefrom;

(ii) "COVID-19 medical testing" means testing
performed to detect, diagnose or monitor COVID-19
including, but not limited to, molecular testing,
temperature testing, nasal swabbing, nasopharyngeal
swabbing, oropharyngeal swabbing, saliva testing, antigen
testing, antibody testing, urinalysis and blood testing;

(iii) "Face covering" means a mask or protective
covering for the mouth and nose, typically worn to reduce
the spread of COVID-19;

(iv) "Vaccination" means the act of
administering a vaccine;

HB0096

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0239
(v) "Vaccine" means any substance including
live, weakened or dead viruses designed to be administered
to a person to produce immunity and prevent infectious
viruses and diseases.

(b) No person who receives subsidies from the state
or federal government shall:

(i) Refuse, withhold from or deny a person any
services, goods, facilities, advantages or privileges that
are public in nature or that invite the patronage of the
public based on a person's COVID-19 vaccination or booster
status, whether a person is not wearing a face covering or
whether a person refuses to submit to COVID-19 medical
testing;

(ii) Publish, display or mail, either directly
or indirectly, any communication, notice or advertisement
that states that a person is required to wear a face
covering, to have a COVID-19 vaccination or booster or to
submit to COVID-19 medical testing as a condition for
receiving or accessing services, goods, facilities,
HB0096

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0239
advantages or privileges that are public in nature or that
invite the patronage of the public.

(c) Any person aggrieved by a violation of subsection
(b) of this section may file a civil action to recover a
civil award of not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000.00).

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0096